Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2513
Special grant
funds; designation.

For purposes of the general
fund budget of expenditures as defined in section 79-1003, funds received
to carry out the services coordination functions or designated as reimbursement for costs
associated with the implementation and administration of the billing system
pursuant to section 43-2511 shall be considered special grant
funds.

Laws 1991, LB 701, § 12;

Laws 1993, LB 520, § 19;

Laws 1994, LB 1290, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 840, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 1051;

Laws 2014, LB276, § 2.